Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.410.100

Revocation of authority to teach—Hearings.

Any teacher whose certificate to teach has been questioned under RCW 28A.410.090 shall have a right to be heard by the issuing authority before his or her certificate is revoked.

[ 2009 c 531 s 3; 2005 c 497 s 207; 1992 c 159 s 6; 1990 c 33 s 409; 1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s 138; 1971 c 48 s 52; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.70.170. Prior: 1909 c 97 p 346 s 3; RRS s 4994. Formerly RCW 28A.70.170, 28.70.170.]

NOTES:

Intent—Part headings not law—Effective date—2005 c 497: See notes following RCW 28A.305.011.

Findings—1992 c 159: See note following RCW 28A.400.303.

Severability—1971 c 48: See note following RCW 28A.310.250.